Connecticut, session 2026, SB00365.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Bridging prescription" means a temporary, short-term
prescription issued to ensure continuity of medication while a patient
awaits specialized care;
(2) "Buprenorphine" means a synthetic opiate with partial agonist
actions used in the treatment of opioid use disorder;
(3) "Community provider" means a health care provider that is
licensed and equipped to administer buprenorphine or methadone;
(4) "Last-dose letter" means a formal, sealed document provided by a
hospital to a patient that confirms the exact date, time and amount of
the last dose of methadone administered to the patient;
(5) "Methadone" means a controlled, long-acting full opioid agonist
medication used in the treatment of opioid use disorder;
(6) "Opioid antagonist" means naloxone hydrochloride or any other
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 365
similarly acting and equally safe drug approved by the federal Food and
Drug Administration for the treatment of a drug overdose;
(7) "Opioid use disorder" means a medical condition characterized by
a problematic pattern of opioid use and misuse leading to clinically
significant impairment or distress; and
(8) "Treatment program" means a program operated by the
Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services or approved by
the Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services for
treatment of the physical and psychological effects of drug dependency
or for the detoxification of a drug-dependent person, as defined in
section 17a-680 of the general statutes.
(b) On and after January 1, 2027, each hospital licensed pursuant to
chapter 368v of the general statutes shall (1) administer buprenorphine
or methadone to each patient presenting to the hospital's emergency
department with symptoms of opioid use disorder without requiring
the admission of the patient to the hospital for the sole purpose of such
administration, provided (A) the administration of buprenorphine or
methadone is clinically indicated, and (B) the patient consents to such
administration, (2) offer the patient a prescription for or a supply of an
opioid antagonist at the time of such patient's discharge from the
emergency department and, if the patient accepts the offer, provide the
patient with such prescription or dispense an opioid antagonist to the
patient, and (3) refer the patient to one or more local treatment programs
or community providers, provided the hospital shall refer a patient to
whom the hospital administered methadone to a treatment program or
community provider that administers methadone. If a hospital
administers buprenorphine to a patient under this subsection, the
hospital shall provide the patient with a bridging prescription for
buprenorphine for the time period during which the patient will be
awaiting treatment from the local treatment program or community
provider to which the hospital refers the patient. If a hospital
administers methadone to a patient under this subsection, the hospital
shall provide the patient with a last-dose letter to provide to the local
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 365
treatment program or community provider to which the hospital refers
the patient.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to (1) require the
provision of any medication when clinically contraindicated, (2) limit
the exercise of professional judgment by a treating clinician, or (3)
preclude the use of any medication other than buprenorphine or
methadone for opioid use disorder when such medication is clinically
indicated and the patient consents to the administration of such
medication.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3